Massachusetts, session 194th, H5306.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. Chapter 138 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2024 Official Edition, 
is hereby amended by inserting after section 16D the following new section:- 
Section 16E. No new premises located within a radius of five hundred feet of a premises 
licensed for the sale of alcoholic beverages not to be drunk on premises may be licensed for the 
sale of alcoholic beverages not be drunk on premises unless the local licensing authority 
determines in writing and after a hearing that the new premises are not detrimental to public 
health, safety, and the general welfare of the community; provided, however, this provision shall 
not apply to the transfer of a license from premises located within said distance to other premises 
located therein, if it is transferred to a location not less remote from the existing licensee. Any 
applicant who has been denied a license under this section shall have the right to an appeal under 
section 67. 
SECTION 2.  This act shall apply to new licenses issued on or after January 1, 2027.